Louisiana, session 2026, HB155.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:337(A)(1)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§337. Unlawful use of an unmanned aircraft system
A.(1) Unlawful use of an unmanned aircraft system is any of the following:
* * *
(b) The intentional use of an unmanned aircraft system, without the express
written consent of the person in charge of the location, over the any of the following
locations:
(i) The grounds of the state capitol, which shall include all of the following:
(aa) The state capitol building, including designated parking areas, the front
steps, and patios, that is bounded on the north by Capitol Access Road, on the east
by Veteran's Memorial Park and North Fifth Street, on the south by Capitol Gardens,
and on the west by North Third Street.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 155 ENROLLED
(bb) The Capitol Annex Building, including designated parking areas, that
is bounded on the north by the steps to the Claiborne Building, on the east by North
Third Street, on the south by State Capitol Drive, and on the west by the Mississippi
River.
(cc) The Capitol Gardens, including designated parking areas, that are
bounded on the north by the state capitol building, the east by North Fifth Street, the
south by Spanish Town Road, and the west by North Third Street.
(dd) The Louisiana Pentagon Barracks, including designated parking areas,
that are bounded on the north by State Capitol Drive, on the east by North Third
Street, on the south by A.Z. Young Park, and on the west by the Mississippi River.
(ee) Veteran's Memorial Park, including the grounds of the Old Arsenal
Museum, that is bounded on the north by Capitol Lake Drive, on the east by Capitol
Access Road, on the south by State Capitol Drive, and on the west by the grounds
of the state capitol building.
(ff) The waters and banks or shorelines of Capitol Lake.
(gg) A.Z. Young Park that is bounded on the north by the Louisiana
Pentagon Barracks, the east by North Third Street, on the south by Lafayette Street,
and on the west by the Mississippi River.
(hh) The Claiborne Building and associated grounds, land, and area
immediately surrounding it that are considered part of the property and closely
associated with its use, including designated parking areas, that are bounded on the
north by the intersection of River Road and North Third Street southbound, the east
by North Third Street, on the south by the Capitol Annex Building, and on the west
by River Road.
(ii) The parking garage and associated grounds, land, and area immediately
surrounding it that are considered part of the property and closely associated with its
use that are bounded on the north by State Capitol Drive, on the east by North Sixth
Street, on the south by Lakeland Drive, and on the west by North Fifth Street.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 155 ENROLLED
(ii) The grounds of the governor's mansion,.
(iii) The grounds of any state or local jail, prison, or other correctional
facility that incarcerates or detains juveniles or adults accused of, convicted of,
sentenced for, or adjudicated delinquent for violations of criminal law without the
express written consent of the person in charge of that state building, state or local
jail, prison, or other correctional facility.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.